Hawaii, session 2025, HB263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 249, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§249-    Exemption for students.  One noncommercial motor vehicle registered to an individual attending college as a full-time student shall be exempt from the vehicle weight tax provided for in this chapter." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________